Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1123.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 302a. (1) A health facility shall not discriminate against a person with a disability with regard to that person's medical treatment. Discrimination under this section includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a) Basing the allocation or withdrawal of any good, benefit, or service on the person's disability. (b) Denying or limiting medical treatment to the person if the denial or limitation is based on any of the following: (i) A bias or stereotype about the person's disability. (ii) A judgment that the person will be a burden on others, including, but not limited to, caregivers, family members, or society, due to the person's disability. (iii) A belief that the life of the person has lesser value than the life of a person without a disability, or that life with a disability is not worth living. (iv) Assumed remaining life years or quality-adjusted life years, regardless of whether the basis is supported by medical evidence. (c) If the person or the person's authorized representative seeks or consents to treatment for a diagnosable symptom or medical condition separate from the person's disability, regardless of whether the symptom or condition is a disability or is causally connected to the person's underlying disability, denying or limiting clinically appropriate treatment if the health facility would offer the treatment to a similarly situated person without an underlying disability. (d) Providing a medical treatment to the person based on the person's disability if the health facility would not provide the same treatment to a person without a disability, unless the person's disability affects the effectiveness or ease of administration of the treatment or has a medical effect on the condition to which the treatment is directed. (2) A health facility shall ensure that a person with a disability receives both of the following: (a) A reasonable accommodation or modification, if the accommodation or modification is necessary to provide the person full enjoyment of a medical treatment. (b) Access to visitation and advocacy assistance of the person's choice if it is safe to do so and not prohibited under law or an emergency or executive order. (3) This section does not do any of the following: (a) Require a health facility to provide a medical treatment to a person with a disability if the health facility has a legitimate, nondiscriminatory reason to deny or limit the medical treatment or if the person's disability causes the person to be unqualified for treatment. The bases described in subsection (1)(b) are not legitimate, nondiscriminatory reasons to deny or limit medical treatment and may not be a basis for a determination that a person with a disability is not qualified for treatment or that a treatment is not clinically appropriate for that person. Circumstances in which a health facility may deny or limit treatment under this subdivision include, but are not limited to, both of the following: (i) The health facility declines to provide the same medical treatment to any person. (ii) The health facility reasonably determines based on current medical knowledge or the best available objective evidence that the medical treatment is not clinically appropriate for a particular person. (b) Require a health facility to provide a medical treatment to a person with a disability if that person or the person's authorized representative does not consent to the medical treatment. (c) Allow a health facility to discriminate against a person with a disability on the basis of a disability in seeking to obtain consent from that person or the person's authorized representative to allow the health facility to provide, withhold, or withdraw treatment. (d) Prohibit a health facility from providing a person with a disability or the person's authorized representative with information regarding the implications of different courses of medical treatment based on current medical knowledge or the best available objective evidence. (4) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2)(b), this section applies regardless of whether there is a public health emergency. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Health facility" means a health facility or agency licensed under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260, or any other organized entity where a health care provider provides health care to patients. (b) "Public health emergency" includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) A state of disaster or state of emergency declared under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. (ii) The time period during which an emergency order under section 2253 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MLC 333.2253, is in effect. (iii) A global pandemic declared by the World Health Organization.